Hawaii, session 2026, GM1274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 205, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§205- Passenger or cargo ropeways; prohibited. (a)
Notwithstanding sections 46-4, 205-2, 205-4.5, 205-5, and 205-6,
or any other law to the contrary, no person shall erect,
maintain, or use a passenger or cargo ropeway in any land use
district; provided that a government entity shall be exempt from
this prohibition, subject to approval by the legislature.
(b) As used in this section:
"Aerial lift" means a ropeway on which passengers or cargo
are transported in cabins or on chairs, including detachable
grip lifts.
"Aerial tramway" means a ropeway on which passengers or
cargo are transported in cable-supported cabins or on cable-
supported chairs that:
(1) Are not in contact with the ground or terrain; and
2026-3457 HB1881 CDl HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(2) Reciprocate between terminals.
"Detachable grip lift” means a monocable or bicable ropeway
system on which cabins or chairs circulate around the system
alternately attaching to and detaching from a moving haul rope.
"Funicular" means a ropeway on which carriers or cargo are
supported and guided by a guideway, propelled by means of a haul
rope system, and operated as a single or double reversible
system.
"Passenger or cargo ropeway" means a device or system used
to transport passengers or cargo along a level, inclined, or
declined path by means of a haul rope or other flexible elements
that is driven by a power unit that remains essentially at a
single location. "Passenger or cargo ropeway" includes;
(1) Aerial lifts;
(2) Aerial tramways; and
(3) Funiculars.
"Passenger or cargo ropeway" does not include elevators or a
device or system strictly for private, single-home use with a
ropeway length no greater than one hundred feet."
SECTION 2. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
2026-3457 HB1881 CDl HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3457 HB1881 CDl HMSO

■IHlHIIIIBIIIIIIIinillll

H.B. NO.
“’
h i
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1881, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby eertify that the above-refereneed Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1881, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
85-26